Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-236
Contagious diseases; control; board of health; hospitals.

A city of the primary class may make all such ordinances, bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with the general laws of the state as may be necessary or expedient to promote the public health, safety, and welfare, including ordinances, bylaws, rules, and regulations as may be necessary or expedient to prevent the introduction or spread of contagious, infectious, or malignant diseases. This power and authority is granted to such city in the area which is within the corporate limits of the city and its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction. The city may create a department of health, make laws and regulations for that purpose, and enforce such ordinances, bylaws, rules, and regulations as provided in section 15-263.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXVII, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 4447;

Laws 1919, c. 40, § 1, p. 123;

C.S.1922, § 3831;

C.S.1929, § 15-234;

R.S.1943, § 15-236;

Laws 1967, c. 57, § 1, p. 193;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 53.

The city of Lincoln enacted Municipal Code § 8.44.040, which regulates the disposition of refuse pursuant to a grant of authority found in this section. The court held that the authority to enforce ordinances is granted to an area within the city or within three miles of the city and outside any organized city or village. State v. Austin, 209 Neb. 174, 306 N.W.2d 861 (1981).